Washington statutes.
RCW 4.72.050

Conditions precedent to vacation.

The judgment shall not be vacated on motion or petition until it is adjudged that there is a valid defense to the action in which the judgment is rendered; or, if the plaintiff seeks its vacation, that there is a valid cause of action; and when judgment is modified, all liens and securities obtained under it shall be preserved to the modified judgment.

[Code 1881 s 441; 1877 p 97 s 443; 1875 p 22 s 6; RRS s 469.]